North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-09 Parent and Child
14-09-16.
Control of property of child.

The parent, as such, has no control over the property of the child.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 93; R.C. 1895, § 2783; R.C. 1899, § 2783; R.C. 1905, § 4095; C.L. 1913, § 4427; R.C. 1943, § 14-0916.

14-09-17.
Child’s earnings — Relinquished by parent.

The parent, whether solvent or insolvent, may relinquish to the child the right of controlling the child and receiving the child’s earnings. Abandonment by the parent is presumptive evidence of such relinquishment.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 102; R.C. 1895, § 2792; R.C. 1899, § 2792; R.C. 1905, § 4104; C.L. 1913, § 4436; R.C. 1943, § 14-0917.

14-09-18.
Wages of minors.

The wages of a minor employed in service may be paid to the minor until the parent or guardian entitled thereto gives the employer notice that the parent or guardian claims such wages.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 103; R.C. 1895, § 2793; R.C. 1899, § 2793; R.C. 1905, § 4105; C.L. 1913, § 4437; R.C. 1943, § 14-0918.

Cross-References.

Minors defined, see N.D.C.C. § 14-10-01.

14-09-19.
Parental abuse.

The abuse of parental authority is the subject of judicial cognizance in a civil action in the district court brought by the child, or by relatives of the child within the third degree, or by the human service zone of the county where the child resides, and when the abuse is established the child may be freed from the dominion of the parent and the duty of support and education may be enforced.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 94; R.C. 1895, § 2784; R.C. 1899, § 2784; R.C. 1905, § 4096; C.L. 1913, § 4428; R.C. 1943, § 14-0919; 2019, ch. 391, § 8, effective January 1, 2020.

Cross-References.

Child abuse, reporting requirements, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-25.1.

Justifiable use of force for discipline of minor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-05-05.

Termination of parental rights, see N.D.C.C. § 27-20-44.

14-09-20.
When parent’s authority ceases.

The authority of a parent ceases:

Upon the appointment by a court of a guardian of the person of a child;

Upon the marriage of a child; or

Upon the child attaining majority.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 95; R.C. 1895, § 2785; R.C. 1899, § 2785; R.C. 1905, § 4097; C.L. 1913, § 4429; R.C. 1943, § 14-0920.

Cross-References.

Termination of parental rights, see
N.D.C.C. §§ 27-20-44.

Collateral References.

Majority, when deemed attained, 5 A.L.R.2d 1143.

Parent’s or relative’s rights of visitation of adult against latter’s wishes, 40 A.L.R.4th 846.

Parents’ mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights — Constitutional issues, 110 A.L.R.5th 579.

Parents’ mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights — General considerations, 113 A.L.R.5th 349.

Parents’ mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights-Issues concerning guardian ad litem and counsel, 118 A.L.R.5th 561.

Parents’ mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights-Applicability of Americans With Disabilities Act, 119 A.L.R.5th 351.

Parents’ mental illness or mental deficiency as ground for termination of parental rights-Evidentiary issues, 122 A.L.R.5th 385.

14-09-21.
Parent and child not liable for acts of other.

Neither parent nor child is answerable as such for the act of the other.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 105; R.C. 1895, § 2795; R.C. 1899, § 2795; R.C. 1905, § 4107; C.L. 1913, § 4439; R.C. 1943, § 14-0921.

Cross-References.

Civil liability of parents for willful damage by child, up to one-thousand dollars, see N.D.C.C. § 32-03-39.

Minors liable for wrongs, see N.D.C.C. § 14-10-03.

14-09-22.
Abuse of child — Mandatory sentence — Penalty.

Except as provided in subsection 2 or 3, a parent, adult family or household member, guardian, or other custodian of any child, who willfully inflicts or allows to be inflicted upon the child mental injury or bodily injury, substantial bodily injury, or serious bodily injury as defined by section 12.1-01-04 is guilty of a class C felony except if the victim of an offense under this section is under the age of six years in which case the offense is a class B felony.

A person who provides care, supervision, education, or guidance for a child unaccompanied by the child’s parent, adult family or household member, guardian, or custodian in exchange for money, goods, or other services and who while providing such services commits an offense under this section is guilty of a class B felony. Any such person who commits, allows to be committed, or conspires to commit, against the child, a sex offense as defined in chapter 12.1-20 is subject to the penalties provided in that chapter.

A person who commits an offense under this section is guilty of a class B felony if the victim suffers permanent loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member or organ, except if the victim of the offense is under the age of six years in which case the offense is a class A felony.

A person who has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or has been found guilty of an offense under this section must be sentenced to a minimum of one year imprisonment.

For any person who pleads guilty or is convicted of an offense under this section, the court shall include in the sentence an order for the person to complete a parental capacity evaluation, mental health evaluation, and anger management assessment, and to complete treatment recommendations as ordered by the court as a condition of probation.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 14-0922; S.L. 1973, ch. 120, § 10; 1975, ch. 106, § 113; 1991, ch. 511, § 1; 1999, ch. 123, § 4; 2001, ch. 155, § 1; 2011, ch. 113, § 1; 2015, ch. 127, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 104, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 130, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 14-09-22 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 130, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1395; and Section 2 of Chapter 104, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1396.

Cross-References.

Abandonment or nonsupport of child a felony, see N.D.C.C. § 14-07-15.

Duty to support children, see N.D.C.C. § 14-09-08.

14-09-22.1.
Neglect of child — Penalty.

A parent, adult family or household member, guardian, or other custodian of any child, who willfully commits any of the following offenses is guilty of a class C felony:

Fails to provide proper parental care or control, subsistence, education as required by law, or other care or control necessary for the child’s physical, mental, or emotional health, or morals.

Permits the child to be, or fails to exercise reasonable diligence in preventing the child from being, in a disreputable place or associating with vagrants or vicious or immoral persons.

Permits the child to engage in, or fails to exercise reasonable diligence in preventing the child from engaging in, an occupation forbidden by the laws of this state or an occupation injurious to the child’s health or morals or the health or morals of others.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 127, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

14-09-23.
Full faith and credit for paternity determinations.

In any proceeding in which paternity or nonpaternity of a child is alleged, full faith and credit must be given to a determination of paternity by another state, made before a determination of paternity under the laws of this state, whether established through voluntary acknowledgment or through administrative or judicial process.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 156, § 1.

14-09-24.
Interference with visitation — Attorney’s fees — Enforcement remedies and tools.

In any proceeding in which child visitation is properly in dispute between the parents of a child, the court shall award the noncustodial parent reasonable attorney’s fees and costs if the court determines there has been willful and persistent denial of visitation rights by the custodial parent with respect to the child. The court may use any remedy that is available to enforce a child support order and which is appropriate to enforce visitation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 151, § 1; 1999, ch. 146, § 2.

14-09-25.
State disbursement unit — Duties — Continuing appropriation.

The child support agency shall establish a state disbursement unit for the collection and disbursement of payments of child support. The state disbursement unit is responsible for the collection and disbursement of all payments under child support orders.

The child support agency may contract with any public or private entity for any service provided by the state disbursement unit. The state disbursement unit may employ technology and agents to allow receipt of child support payments at locations and times when state disbursement unit staff are not available.

The state disbursement unit shall use automated procedures, electronic processes, and computer-driven technology, including the statewide automated data processing system established under section 50-09-02.1, to the maximum extent feasible, efficient, and economical, for the collection and distribution of child support payments.

The state disbursement unit shall account for and disburse all support payments received by it, maintain necessary records, and develop procedures for providing information to the parties, including the obligor and obligee, regarding actions taken and, at least annually, regarding child support payments collected and distributed. The state disbursement unit shall adopt procedures for the maintenance and retention of records of child support payments and for the storage and destruction of records when the support obligation is satisfied or is terminated.

The state disbursement unit shall deposit all child support payments received in the state treasury. All payments so deposited, except those payments assigned to the state, are appropriated to the child support agency as a standing and continuing appropriation for the purpose of making disbursements to obligees entitled to the child support payments collected.

Notwithstanding section 28-20-36, the state disbursement unit shall disburse collected child support payments in conformity with title IV-D of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 93-647; 88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. 651 et seq.]. Any disbursement made in error is not a gift and must be repaid. The child support agency may take any action not inconsistent with law to secure repayment of any disbursement made in error. Interest accrued on an unpaid child support obligation is child support. To the extent consistent with the requirements of title IV-D, a payment received with respect to a child support arrearage must first be applied to accrued interest on the earliest arrearage, and then to the principal of that arrearage. The child support agency may calculate judgment interest accrued on child support obligations that first became arrearages after July 1, 2002. The child support agency shall enter in its records judgment interest on child support obligations that first became arrearages on or before July 1, 2002, for periods before January 1, 2004, only if a court has ordered the interest amount calculated by some individual or entity other than the child support agency and approved the calculated amount. For child support obligations that first became arrearages on or before July 1, 2002, the child support agency may calculate judgment interest accrued only for periods on or after January 1, 2004. For purposes of this subsection, arrearage means an unpaid child support obligation that was due in a month prior to the current month.

Unless notice has otherwise been provided, the state disbursement unit shall provide notice to the obligor, the obligee, and any income payer that payment must be made to the state disbursement unit.

The child support agency may suspend or waive judgment interest on an arrearage as part of an amnesty program, as an incentive for satisfying a child support obligation or complying with a payment plan, or if the child support agency determines that the judgment interest is not collectible through commercially reasonable efforts. This subsection applies to judgment interest accruing before July 1, 2005, only if the arrearage is assigned to the child support agency under section 50-09-06.1 or 50-24.1-02.1 or if the obligee provides written consent. Any judgment interest that is suspended or waived under this subsection may be reinstated by the child support agency if the obligor has failed to comply with a payment plan.

If an obligee is deceased, any past-due child support that is received must be disbursed in the following order:

As specifically provided in a court order in the event of the obligee’s death;

To the obligee’s estate or as provided in the obligee’s will;

To the child or children on whose behalf the payments were made if the child or children are all eighteen years of age or older;

As directed by the court if one or more of the children to whom the child support is owed is under eighteen years old; or

Refunded to the obligor if the court determines that the past-due child support cannot be disbursed under this section.

Unless any party to a child support order objects within ten days of the date of a notice sent by first-class mail to the party’s last-known address, the child support agency may change the payee of a child support obligation for the current month or a future month upon request of a guardian or other person who has legal custody of the child or children for whom the child support is being paid.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 9; 1999, ch. 141, § 10; 1999, ch. 284, § 1; 2001, ch. 156, § 1; 2003, ch. 124, § 5; 2005, ch. 415, § 6; 2007, ch. 148, § 11; 2009, ch. 419, § 6; 2019, ch. 127, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

14-09-26.
Modification of existing child support orders.

A child support order issued under any provision of this code and in effect on October 1, 1998, is deemed to require payment to the state disbursement unit after September 30, 1998.

A child support order issued under any provision of this code after September 30, 1998, must require payment to the state disbursement unit.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 10; 2021, ch. 30, § 9, effective July 1, 2021.

14-09-27.
State disbursement unit fund — Continuing appropriation — Correction of errors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 141, § 26.

14-09-28.
Parental custody and visitation rights and duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 12.

14-09-29.
Parental rights and responsibilities — Best interests and welfare of child.

A court issuing an order that deals with parenting rights and responsibilities of a child entered under this chapter shall award the parental rights and responsibilities concerning the child to a person, agency, organization, or institution as will, in the opinion of the court, promote the best interests and welfare of the child. Between the mother and father, whether married or unmarried, there is no presumption as to whom will better promote the best interests and welfare of the child.

If the court finds that a parent has perpetrated domestic violence and that parent does not have residential responsibility, and there exists one incident of domestic violence which resulted in serious bodily injury or involved the use of a dangerous weapon or there exists a pattern of domestic violence within a reasonable time proximate to the proceeding, the court shall allow only supervised parenting time with that parent unless there is a showing by clear and convincing evidence that unsupervised parenting time would not endanger the child’s physical or emotional health.

If any court finds that a parent has sexually abused the parent’s child, the court shall prohibit contact between the abusive parent and the child until the court finds that the abusive parent has successfully completed a treatment program designed for such sexual abusers and that supervised parenting time is in the child’s best interests. Contact between the abusive parent and the child may be allowed only in a therapeutic setting, facilitated by a therapist as part of a sexual abuse treatment program, and only when the therapist for the abusive parent and the therapist for the abused child agree that contact serves a therapeutic purpose and is in the best interests of the child.

In any proceeding dealing with parental rights and responsibilities in which a parent is found to have perpetrated domestic violence, and there exists one incident of domestic violence which resulted in serious bodily injury or involved the use of a dangerous weapon or there exists a pattern of domestic violence within a reasonable time proximate to the proceeding, all court costs, attorney’s fees, evaluation fees, and expert witness fees must be paid by the perpetrator of the domestic violence unless those costs would place an undue financial hardship on that parent.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 4.

14-09-30.
Parenting plans — Contents.

In any proceeding to establish or modify a judgment providing for parenting time with a child, the parents shall develop and file with the court a parenting plan to be included in the court’s decree. If the parents are unable to agree on a parenting plan, the court shall issue a parenting plan considering the best interests of the child.

A parenting plan must include, at a minimum, provisions regarding the following or an explanation as to why a provision is not included:

Decisionmaking responsibility relative to:

Routine or day-to-day decisions; and

Major decisions such as education, health care, and spiritual development;

Information sharing and access, including telephone and electronic access;

Legal residence of a child for school attendance;

Residential responsibility, parenting time, and parenting schedule, including:

Holidays and days off from school, birthday, and vacation planning;

Weekends and weekdays; and

Summers;

Transportation and exchange of the child, considering the safety of the parties;

Procedure for review and adjustment of the plan; and

Methods for resolving disputes.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 4.

14-09-31.
Decisionmaking responsibility.

Except as provided in subsection 3, in the making of any order relative to decisionmaking responsibility:

If the parents have reached an agreement as to decisionmaking responsibility, the court shall accept the agreement unless the court makes written findings that the agreement is not in the best interests of the child.

If the parents cannot agree on an allocation of decisionmaking responsibility, the court shall enter an order allocating decisionmaking responsibility in the best interests of the child.

An allocation of decisionmaking responsibility is not in the best interests of the child unless the order includes a method of resolving disputes when parents do not agree on an issue.

If the court finds that domestic violence as defined in section 14-07.1-01 has occurred, the court shall consider such domestic violence in determining whether joint decisionmaking responsibility is in the best interests of the child. In such cases, the court shall make orders for the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities that best protect the child, the parent, or both. If joint decisionmaking responsibility is granted, even though there is evidence of domestic violence, the court shall provide written findings to support the order.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 4.

14-09-32.
Parental rights and responsibilities.

Each parent of a child has the following rights and responsibilities:

Right to access and obtain copies of the child’s educational, medical, dental, religious, insurance, and other records or information.

Right to attend educational conferences concerning the child. This right does not require any school to hold a separate conference with each parent.

Right to reasonable access to the child by written, telephonic, and electronic means.

Duty to inform the other parent as soon as reasonably possible of a serious accident or serious illness for which the child receives health care treatment. The parent shall provide to the other parent a description of the serious accident or serious illness, the time of the serious accident or serious illness, and the name and location of the treating health care provider.

Duty to immediately inform the other parent of residential telephone numbers and address, and any changes to the same.

Duty to keep the other parent informed of the name and address of the school the child attends.

The court shall include in an order establishing or modifying parental rights and responsibilities the rights and duties listed in this section; however, the court may restrict or exclude any right or duty listed in this section if the order states the reason in support of the restriction or exclusion. The court shall consider any domestic violence protection orders relating to the parties when determining whether to restrict or exclude any right or duty listed in this section.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 4.

14-09-33.
References to child custody and custodial parent.

Any law that refers to the “custody” of a child means the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities as provided in this chapter. Any law that refers to a “custodial parent” or “primary residential responsibility” means a parent with more than fifty percent of the residential responsibility and any reference to a noncustodial parent means a parent with less than fifty percent of the residential responsibility.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 10.

14-09-34.
Electronic remittal of funds withheld under an income withholding order.

An income payer that employs more than twenty-four employees at any time and has received more than four income withholding orders under this chapter shall remit any withheld funds by an electronic method approved by the child support agency. An income payer that employs more than twenty-four employees at any time and has received fewer than five income withholding orders under this chapter may choose to opt out of an electronic method approved by the child support agency only through a written request. An income payer that does not comply with this section is deemed to have failed to deliver income under section 14-09-09.3. The child support agency may waive, upon a showing of good cause, the requirement to remit funds electronically.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 251, § 1.

14-09-35.
Missing child — Duty to report — Penalty.

For purposes of this section and section 14-09-36caretaker” means the individual who is responsible for the physical control of a child and who is the child’s biological or adoptive parent, the spouse of the child’s biological or adoptive parent, or an individual acting in the stead of a child’s parent at the request of the parent or another with authority to make the request. “"Caretaker” does not include an individual who is charged with the enforcement of compulsory attendance provisions under section 15.1-20-03.

A caretaker who is responsible at that time for the care of a child under the age of thirteen years and who is unable to make contact with or otherwise verify the whereabouts and safety of that child for a period of twenty-four hours after the caretaker knows or reasonably should have known the child is missing is guilty of a class C felony if the caretaker willfully fails to report the child as missing to law enforcement within a reasonable time after this twenty-four-hour period expires.

A caretaker who is responsible at that time for the care of a child at least thirteen years of age but under the age of seventeen years and who is unable to make contact with or otherwise verify the whereabouts and safety of that child for a period of forty-eight hours after the caretaker knows or reasonably should have known the child is missing is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the caretaker willfully fails to report the child as missing to law enforcement within a reasonable time after the forty-eight-hour period expires.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 125, § 1.

14-09-36.
Death of a child — Duty to report — Penalty.

A caretaker of a child in the caretaker’s care is guilty of a class C felony if the caretaker willfully fails to:

Report the child’s death to a law enforcement agency within two hours after learning about the child’s death; or

Report the location of the child’s corpse to a law enforcement agency within two hours after learning the location of the corpse.

This section does not apply to the death of a child which occurs while the child is under the care of a health care professional or emergency medical personnel.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 125, § 2.